New York, session 2025-2026, A3036.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 845-f 2 to read as follows: 3 § 845-f. Release of certain records of victims of police violence; 4 medical examiners. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contra- 5 ry, no coroner, coroner's physician or medical examiner who performs an 6 inquiry, autopsy or examination, including any report prepared thereon, 7 over an instance or occurrence in which a police officer, as defined in 8 subdivision thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, 9 or a peace officer, as defined in section 2.10 of the criminal procedure 10 law, employs the use of force, as described in section eighty hundred 11 thirty-seven-t of this article, shall publicly release or otherwise 12 disseminate any information, including but not limited to providing such 13 information to a news or media organization, related to either the crim- 14 inal history or any mental health history of the individual who was the 15 subject of the use of force. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06399-02-5